nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsapparater > Gulv- og damprensere > Dampmopper: 2-i-1-dampmopper; Sylinderdampmopper; Bærbare dampmopper; Dampmopper for flere overflater; Vertikale dampmopper; Vakuumbaserte dampmopper
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домакински уреди > Уреди за почистване на подове и парочистачки > Парни мопове: 2 в 1 парни мопове; Цилиндрични парни мопове; Ръчни парни мопове; Парни мопове за различни повърхности; Изправени парни мопове; Вакуумни парни мопове
es: Casa y jardín > Electrodomésticos > Limpiadores de vapor de alfombras y suelos > Mopas de vapor: Mopas de vapor 2 en 1; Mopas de vapor cilíndrica; Mopas de vapor manuales; Mopas de vapor multisuperficie; Mopas de vapor verticales; Mopas de vapor al vacío
vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị gia dụng > Thiết bị làm sạch bằng hơi nước > Cây lau sàn hơi nước: Cây lau sàn hơi nước 2 trong 1; Cây lau sàn hơi nước hình trụ; Cây lau sàn hơi nước cầm tay; Cây lau sàn hơi nước đa bề mặt; Cây lau sàn hơi nước thẳng đứng; Cây lau sàn hơi nước chân không
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 > 바닥/스팀 청소기 > 스팀 청소기: 투인원 스팀 청소기; 실린더 스팀 청소기; 휴대용 스팀 물걸레; 다용도 스팀 물걸레; 직립형 스팀 청소기; 진공 스팀 청소기
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneet > Lattia- ja höyrypesurit > Höyrymopit: 2-in-1-höyrymopit; Sylinterihöyrymopit; Käsikäyttöiset höyrymopit; Monikäyttöiset höyrymopit; Pystyasentoiset höyrymopit; Tyhjiöhöyrymopit
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kućanski aparati > Čistači i parni čistači za podove > Parni brisači: 2-u-1 parni brisači; Cilindrični parni brisači; Ručni parni brisači; Parni brisači za razne površine; Uspravni parni brisači; Usisni parni čistači
pl: Dom i ogród > Sprzęt AGD > Myjki parowe do dywanów > Mopy parowe: Mopy parowe 2 w 1; Mopy parowe cylindryczne; Mopy parowe ręczne; Mopy parowe do wielu powierzchni; Mopy parowe stojące; Mopy parowe podciśnieniowe
fr: Maison et jardin > Appareils électroménagers > Nettoyeurs de sols et vapeur > Balais vapeur: Balais vapeur 2 en 1; Balais vapeur cylindriques; Balais vapeur portatifs; Balais vapeur multi-surfaces; Balais vapeur verticales; Balais vapeur aspirateurs
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家用电器 > 电动蒸汽拖把 > 蒸汽拖把: 二合一蒸汽拖把; 气缸蒸汽拖把; 手持式蒸汽拖把; 多面蒸汽拖把; 立式蒸汽拖把; 真空蒸汽拖把
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče > Čističe podlah a parní čističe > Parní mopy: Parní mopy 2 v 1; Válcové parní mopy; Ruční parní mopy; Parní mopy na různé povrchy; Vertikální/tyčové parní mopy; Parní mopy s vysavačem
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電 > カーペット用スチームクリーナー > スチームモップ: 2-in-1スチームモップ; シリンダースチームモップ; 手持ち型スチームモップ; 多面スチームモップ; 直立型スチームモップ; 真空スチームモップ
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Limpadores de carpete a vapor > Limpadores a vapor: Esfregões a vapor 2 em 1; Esfregões a vapor cilíndricas; Esfregões a vapor portáteis; Esfregões a vapor multi-superfícies; Esfregões a vapor verticais; Esfregões a vapor a vácuo
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aletleri > Zemin Temizleyiciler ve Buharlı Temizleyiciler > Buharlı Paspaslar: 2'si 1 Arada Buharlı Moplar; Silindir Buharlı Moplar; El Tipi Buharlı Moplar; Çok Yüzeyli Buharlı Moplar; Dik Buharlı Moplar; Vakumlu Buharlı Moplar
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte > Teppich- & Dampfreinigungsgeräte > Dampfreiniger: 2-in-1-Dampfmopps; Zylinder-Dampfmopps; Handdampfreiniger; Dampfmopps für verschiedene Oberflächen; Aufrechte Dampfmopps; Staubsauger-Dampfmopps
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Domáce spotrebiče > Parné čističe na podlahy > Parné mopy: Parné mopy 2 v 1; Valcové parné mopy; Ručné parné mopy; Parné mopy na viaceré povrchy; Tyčové parné mopy; Vákuové parné mopy
ru: Дом и сад > Бытовая техника > Техника для влажной уборки полов и ковров > Паровые швабры: Паровые швабры 2 в 1; Напольные паровые швабры; Ручные паровые швабры; Паровые швабры для любых покрытий; Вертикальные паровые швабры; Паровые швабры с функцией пылесоса
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器 > 蒸氣清潔機 > 蒸氣拖把: 二合一蒸氣拖把; 圓筒蒸汽拖把; 手持式蒸汽拖把; 多用途蒸氣拖把; 立式蒸汽拖把; 真空蒸氣拖把
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater > Gulv- og damprensere > Dampmopper: 2-i-1-dampmopper; Cylinderdampmopper; Håndholdte dampmopper; Dampmopper til flere overflader; Opretstående dampmopper; Vakuumdampmopper
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsapparater > Maskiner för ångrengöring av mattor > Ångmopp: 2-i-1-ångmoppar; Cylinderångmoppar; Handhållna ångmoppar; Ångmoppar för flera ytor; Upprättstående ångmoppar; Vakuumångmoppar
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinė technika > Grindų ir gariniai valymo įrenginiai > Garinės šluotos: „Du viename“ garinės šluotos; Cilindrinės garinės šluotos; Rankinės garinės šluotos; Kelių paviršių garinės šluotos; Vertikaliosios garinės šluotos; Vakuuminės garinės šluotos
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Electrocasnice > Dispozitive de curățat podeaua și dispozitive de curățare cu abur > Mopuri cu aburi: Mopuri cu aburi 2-în-1; Mopuri cilindrice cu aburi; Mopuri portabile cu aburi; Mopuri cu aburi pentru suprafețe multiple; Mopuri verticale cu aburi; Mopuri-aspirator cu aburi
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Eletrodomésticos > Dispositivos de limpeza a vapor e de chão > Mopas a vapor: Mopas a vapor 2 em 1; Mopas a vapor cilíndricas; Mopas a vapor portáteis; Mopas a vapor multissuperfícies; Mopas a vapor verticais; Mopas a vapor para aspirar
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski aparati > Čistilci za tla in parni čistilci > Parni čistilci tal: Parni čistilci tal 2 v 1; Parni čistilci tal z valjem; Ročni parni čistilci tal; Večnamenski parni čistilci tal; Pokončni parni čistilci tal; Vakuumski parni čistilci tal
it: Casa e giardino > Dispositivi elettrodomestici > Pulitrici a vapore e lavapavimenti > Scope a vapore: Spazzole a vapore 2 in 1; Spazzole a vapore a cilindro; Spazzole a vapore portatili; Spazzole a vapore multisuperficie; Spazzole a vapore verticali; Scopa a vapore aspirante
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási gépek > Padló- és gőztisztítók > Gőzfelmosók: 2 az 1-ben gőzfelmosók; Hengeres gőzfelmosók; Kézi gőzfelmosók; Többfelületű gőzfelmosók; Álló gőzfelmosók; Vákuumos gőzfelmosók
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Οικιακές συσκευές > Καθαριστές δαπέδου & ατμού > Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού: Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού 2 σε 1; Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού κυλίνδρων; Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού χειρός; Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού πολλαπλών επιφανειών; Όρθιες σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού; Σφουγγαρίστρες ατμού κενού
th: บ้านและสวน > เครื่องใช้ภายในบ้าน > เครื่องทำความสะอาดพื้นแบบไอน้ำ > ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำ: ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำแบบ 2-in-1; ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำทรงกระบอก; ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำแบบพกพา; ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำแบบหลายพื้นผิว; ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำแบบตั้งตรง; ไม้ถูพื้นระบบไอน้ำแบบสุญญากาศ
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliances > Floor & Steam Cleaners > Steam Mops: 2-in-1 Steam Mops; Cylinder Steam Mops; Handheld Steam Mops; Multi-Surface Steam Mops; Upright Steam Mops; Vacuum Steam Mops
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke apparaten > Tapijtstomers > Vloerstomer: 2-in-1 vloerstomer; Cilindervloerstomer; Draagbare vloerstomer; Vloerstomer voor meerdere oppervlakken; Staande vloerstomer; Stofzuigvloerstomer